Massachusetts, session 194th, H1286.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 110M the following section:-
Section 110N. Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued,
delivered or renewed within the commonwealth which provides coverage for colorectal cancer
screenings or breast cancer screenings shall not impose (1) A deductible for a procedure that a
physician initially undertakes as a screening colonoscopy or a screening sigmoidoscopy or a
screening mammogram; or (2) A coinsurance, copayment, deductible or other out-of-pocket
expense for any additional colonoscopy, sigmoidoscopy or mammogram ordered in a policy year
by a physician for an insured.
of 3

SECTION 2. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8AA the following section:-
Section 8BB. Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual
or group hospital service plan delivered or issued or renewed within the commonwealth which
provides coverage for colorectal cancer screenings or breast cancer screenings shall not impose
(1) A deductible for a procedure that a physician initially undertakes as a screening colonoscopy
or a screening sigmoidoscopy or a screening mammogram; or (2) A coinsurance, copayment,
deductible or other out-of-pocket expense for any additional colonoscopy, sigmoidoscopy or
mammogram ordered in a policy year by a physician for an insured.
SECTION 3. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4AA the following section:-
Section 4BB. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth which provides coverage for
colorectal cancer screenings or breast cancer screenings shall not impose (1) A deductible for a
procedure that a physician initially undertakes as a screening colonoscopy or a screening
sigmoidoscopy or a screening mammogram; or (2) A coinsurance, copayment, deductible or
other out-of-pocket expense for any additional colonoscopy, sigmoidoscopy or mammogram
ordered in a policy year by a physician for an insured.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4S the following section:-
Section 4T. Any individual or group health maintenance contract which provides
coverage for colorectal cancer screenings or breast cancer screenings shall not impose (1) A
of 3

deductible for a procedure that a physician initially undertakes as a screening colonoscopy or a
screening sigmoidoscopy or a screening mammogram; or (2) A coinsurance, copayment,
deductible or other out-of-pocket expense for any additional colonoscopy, sigmoidoscopy or
mammogram ordered in a policy year by a physician for an insured.
SECTION 5. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 23 the following section:-
Section 24. Any coverage offered by the commission to any active or retired employee of
the commonwealth who is insured under the group insurance commission which provides
coverage for colorectal cancer screenings or breast cancer screenings shall not impose (1) A
deductible for a procedure that a physician initially undertakes as a screening colonoscopy or a
screening sigmoidoscopy or a screening mammogram; or (2) A coinsurance, copayment,
deductible or other out-of-pocket expense for any additional colonoscopy, sigmoidoscopy or
mammogram ordered in a policy year by a physician for an insured.
of 3